Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 9. Administration of Private Foundation Trusts, Charitable Trusts, and Split-Interest Trusts.

§ 91-9-401.
Prohibited acts.

In the administration of any trust which is a “private foundation,” as defined in Section 509 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, a “charitable trust,” as defined in Section 4947(a)(1) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, or a “split-interest trust,” as defined in Section 4947(a)(2) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, the following acts shall be prohibited:

Engaging in any act of “self-dealing,” as defined in Section 4941(d) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4941(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code;

Retaining any “excess business holdings,” as defined in Section 4943(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4943(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code;

Making any investments which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of the exempt purposes of the trust, within the meaning of Section 4944 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, so as to give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4944(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code; and

Making any “taxable expenditures,” as defined in Section 4945(d) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4945(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

This section shall not apply either to those split-interest trusts or to amounts thereof which are not subject to the prohibitions applicable to private foundations by reason of the provisions of Section 4947 of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-201; Laws, 1972, ch. 423, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1972).

§ 91-9-403.
Distribution of amounts to avoid tax liability.

In the administration of any trust which is a “private foundation,” as defined in Section 509 of the United States Internal Revenue Code, or which is a “charitable trust,” as defined in Section 4947(a)(1) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, there shall be distributed, for the purposes specified in the trust instrument, for each taxable year, amounts at least sufficient to avoid liability for the tax imposed by Section 4942(a) of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-202; Laws, 1972, ch. 423, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1972).

§ 91-9-405.
Applicability of Sections 91-9-401 and 91-9-403 when contrary to trust instrument.

The provisions of Sections 91-9-401 and 91-9-403 shall not apply to any trust to the extent that a court of competent jurisdiction shall determine that such application would be contrary to the terms of the instrument governing such trust and that the same may not properly be changed to conform to such sections. The trustee shall not be held liable to anyone for any payments made under Section 91-9-403 prior to such determination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-203; Laws, 1972, ch. 423, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1972).

§ 91-9-407.
Amendment of trust instrument to exclude application of Sections 91-9-401 and 91-9-403.

The trustees of any trust which is a “private foundation” (as defined in Section 509 of the United States Internal Revenue Code), a “charitable trust” (as defined in Section 4947(a)(1) of the United States Internal Revenue Code) or a “split-interest trust” (as defined in Section 4947(a)(2) of the United States Internal Revenue Code) may, without judicial proceedings, amend the governing instrument of such trust expressly to exclude the application of Sections 91-9-401 and 91-9-403, or any portion thereof, by executing a written amendment to such trust and filing a duplicate original of such amendment with the secretary of state of the State of Mississippi, whereupon such section or sections, or any portion thereof, as the case may be, shall not apply to such trust. Neither the trustees nor the trust shall be liable to anyone for any payments made under Section 91-9-403 prior to such amendment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-203; Laws, 1972, ch. 423, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1972).

§ 91-9-409.
Rights and powers of courts and attorney general.

Nothing in Sections 91-9-401 through 91-9-411 shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the attorney general of this state with respect to any trust.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-204; Laws, 1972, ch. 423, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1972).

§ 91-9-411.
References to United States Internal Revenue Code.

All references to sections of the United States Internal Revenue Code shall be to such law as it exists as of April 28, 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 672-205; Laws, 1972, ch. 423, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 28, 1972).